Washington statutes.
RCW 18.350.030

Application for certification.

(1) Each applicant for certification as a dental anesthesia assistant must submit to the department:

(a) An application, on a form provided by the department, with the applicant's name, address, and name and location of the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist where the assistant will be performing his or her services;

(b) An application fee, as determined by the secretary of health as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280; and

(c) Satisfactory evidence of:

(i) Completion of a commission-approved dental anesthesia assistant training course, to include intravenous access or phlebotomy. This training must include experience starting and maintaining intravenous lines;

(ii) Completion of a commission-approved basic life support/cardiac pulmonary resuscitation course; and

(iii) The valid general anesthesia permit of the oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist where the assistant will be performing his or her services.

(2) The commission may adopt rules for the requirements for renewal of the certification, including continuing education requirements consistent with national oral and maxillofacial surgery requirements.

(3) The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of certifications as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2012 c 23 s 3.]